Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.060

Power of attorney between spouses or domestic partners.

A spouse or domestic partner may constitute the other his or her attorney-in-fact to manage, control or dispose of his or her property with the same power of revocation or substitution as could be exercised were they unmarried persons or were they not in a state registered domestic partnership.

[ 2008 c 6 s 606; Code 1881 s 2403; No RRS.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.